test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - I - mskweyaap :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mskweyaap+NI: mskweyaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mskweyaap+NI: nmiskweyaab
     2+mskweyaap+NI: gmiskweyaab
     3+mskweyaap+NI: miskweyaab
     X+mskweyaap+NI: miskweyaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mskweyaap+NI+Con: mskweyaabiinh
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim: mskweyaabiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej: mskweyaabiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt: mskweyaabiiba
     mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mskweyaap+NI+4: mskweyaabiin
     mskweyaap+NI+Loc: mskweyaabiing
     mskweyaap+NI+Pl: mskweyaabiin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con: nmiskweyaabiinh
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim: nmiskweyaabiins
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con: gmiskweyaabiinh
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim: gmiskweyaabiins
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con: miskweyaabiinh
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim: miskweyaabiins
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con: miskweyaabiinh
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim: miskweyaabiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos: nmiskweyaabiim
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos: gmiskweyaabiim
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos: miskweyaabiim
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos: miskweyaabiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej: nmiskweyaabiish
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej: gmiskweyaabiish
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej: miskweyaabiish
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej: miskweyaabiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiiwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl: miskweyaabiiwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4: miskweyaabiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Prt: nmiskweyaabiiba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiidig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Prt: gmiskweyaabiiba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiidig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Prt: miskweyaabiiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiidig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Prt: miskweyaabiiba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+4: nmiskweyaabiin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Loc: nmiskweyaabiing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pl: nmiskweyaabiin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+4: gmiskweyaabiin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Loc: gmiskweyaabiing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pl: gmiskweyaabiin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+4: miskweyaabiin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Loc: miskweyaabiing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pl: miskweyaabiin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+4: miskweyaabiin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Loc: miskweyaabiing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pl: miskweyaabiin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej: mskweyaabiinyish
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej: mskweyaabiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt: mskweyaabiinyba
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinydig
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt: mskweyaabiinsba
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+4: mskweyaabiinyin
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: mskweyaabiinying
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: mskweyaabiinyin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+4: mskweyaabiinsan
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: mskweyaabiinsing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: mskweyaabiinsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt: mskweyaabiishba
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mskweyaabiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+4: mskweyaabiishan
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: mskweyaabiishing
     mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: mskweyaabiishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+4: mskweyaabiibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos: nmiskweyaabiinyim
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos: nmiskweyaabiinsim
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos: gmiskweyaabiinyim
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos: gmiskweyaabiinsim
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos: miskweyaabiinyim
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos: miskweyaabiinsim
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos: miskweyaabiinyim
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos: miskweyaabiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej: nmiskweyaabiinyish
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej: nmiskweyaabiinsish
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej: gmiskweyaabiinyish
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej: gmiskweyaabiinsish
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej: miskweyaabiinyish
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej: miskweyaabiinsish
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej: miskweyaabiinyish
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej: miskweyaabiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinynaa
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinynaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinywaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinswaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+2+Pl: miskweyaabiinywaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+3+4: miskweyaabiinyni
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+2+Pl: miskweyaabiinswaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+3+4: miskweyaabiinsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinyba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinydig
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinsba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsdig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinyba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinydig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsdig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt: miskweyaabiinyba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinydig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt: miskweyaabiinsba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsdig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Prt: miskweyaabiinyba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinydig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt: miskweyaabiinsba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+4: nmiskweyaabiinyin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinying
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+4: nmiskweyaabiinsan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+4: gmiskweyaabiinyin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinying
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+4: gmiskweyaabiinsan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+4: miskweyaabiinyin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: miskweyaabiinying
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: miskweyaabiinyin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+4: miskweyaabiinsan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: miskweyaabiinsing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: miskweyaabiinsan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+4: miskweyaabiinyin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Loc: miskweyaabiinying
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pl: miskweyaabiinyin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+4: miskweyaabiinsan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Loc: miskweyaabiinsing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pl: miskweyaabiinsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej: nmiskweyaabiimish
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej: gmiskweyaabiimish
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej: miskweyaabiimish
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej: miskweyaabiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: miskweyaabiimwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4: miskweyaabiimni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt: nmiskweyaabiimba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimdig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimdig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt: miskweyaabiimba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimdig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt: miskweyaabiimba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+4: nmiskweyaabiiman
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Loc: nmiskweyaabiiming
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pl: nmiskweyaabiiman
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+4: gmiskweyaabiiman
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Loc: gmiskweyaabiiming
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pl: gmiskweyaabiiman
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+4: miskweyaabiiman
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Loc: miskweyaabiiming
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pl: miskweyaabiiman
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+4: miskweyaabiiman
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Loc: miskweyaabiiming
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pl: miskweyaabiiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl: miskweyaabiishwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4: miskweyaabiishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt: nmiskweyaabiishba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishdig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt: gmiskweyaabiishba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishdig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiishba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiishdig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiishba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+4: nmiskweyaabiishan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: nmiskweyaabiishing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+4: gmiskweyaabiishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: gmiskweyaabiishing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+4: miskweyaabiishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiishing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+4: miskweyaabiishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiishing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiinwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiinaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiiwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiiwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiiwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiiwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+4: miskweyaabiinwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiiniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiibniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiibniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiibniin
